Utah statutes.
19-2-127.   Rules for administering certification for tax relief.
In addition to the powers granted it, the board may formulate, amend, or
cancel rules establishing procedures for processing and evaluating
applications for certification, establishing procedures for the issuance and
revocation of certificates, and all other matters pertaining to the board in
administering certification for tax relief on pollution control facilities.
